Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 6
ANNEXATION

32-11.5-601. Annexation of lands to watershed management area.

The territorial limits of the watershed management area may be enlarged by the annexation of additional real property thereto:

By petition and consent of the fee owner pursuant to sections 32-11.5-602 and 32-11.5-606;

By petition of the eligible electors pursuant to sections 32-11.5-603, 32-11.5-604, and 32-11.5-606;

By action initiated by the district pursuant to sections 32-11.5-605 and 32-11.5-606 with the consent of the governing body of each county or municipality that includes any of the real property to be annexed; or

By petition by the governing body of each county or municipality that includes any of the real property to be annexed.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 870, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-602. Petition of fee owners.

The fee owner of any real property contiguous to the territorial limits of the watershed management area and capable of being served with facilities of the district may file with the board a petition in writing seeking the inclusion of the property in the watershed management area.

The petition authorized in subsection (1) of this section shall:

Set forth an accurate legal description of the property owned by the petitioners;

State that assent to the annexation of the property is given by the signers thereto, constituting all the fee owners of the property; and

Be acknowledged in the same manner required for conveyance of land.

A fee owner may not withdraw a petition after consideration by the board or file further objections except in the case of fraud or misrepresentation.

The board shall hear a petition filed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section at an open meeting after publishing notice of the filing of the petition, the place, time, and date of the meeting, and the names and addresses of the petitioners in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the real property proposed to be annexed is located.

The board shall grant a petition by resolution if it determines that the proposed annexation is feasible and in the best interests of the district. The board may determine that annexation of only a portion of the property proposed to be annexed is appropriate.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 871, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-603. Petition of eligible electors.

Not less than ten percent or one hundred, whichever number is smaller, of the eligible electors of any real property that is contiguous to the watershed management area and contains twenty-five thousand or more square feet of land may file a petition with the board in writing seeking the annexation of the property to the watershed management area; except that no single tract or parcel or property containing ten acres or more may be included in the watershed management area without the consent of the owner.

A petition shall describe the area to be annexed and shall be acknowledged in the same manner required for conveyances of land.

The board shall cause notice of the filing of a petition to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the property proposed to be annexed is located, and the notice shall state:

That a petition has been filed;

The names of the petitioners;

A description of the area proposed to be annexed;

The place, time, and date of a board hearing on the proposed annexation at which the board will consider the petition and all written objections to the petition; and

A statement that all interested persons may appear at the board hearing and show cause in writing why the petition should not be granted.

The eligible electors may not withdraw a petition after consideration by the board or file further objections except in the case of fraud or misrepresentation.

The board shall grant a petition by resolution if it determines that the proposed annexation is feasible and in the best interests of the district.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 871, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-604. Annexation election.

If a petition is provisionally granted pursuant to section 32-11.5-602 or 32-11.5-603, the board by resolution shall:

Make an order to that effect;

Direct that the question of inclusion of the real property proposed to be annexed within the watershed management area be submitted to the eligible electors of the area that includes the real property only; and

Designate the secretary of the board as the designated election official to give notice and conduct the election according to the provisions of articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

If a majority of the votes cast on the question at the election favor inclusion, the board shall by resolution enter an order making the real property a part of the watershed management area.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 872, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-605. Annexation initiated by the board.

At any time and as a condition to an annexation initiated by the board, the board may adopt a resolution determining that real property proposed for annexation:

Is contiguous to the territorial limits of the watershed management area;

Contains six hundred forty or more acres of land;

Has become urbanized by having a population of at least one thousand persons per square mile and having at least five hundred dwelling units per square mile; and

Is capable of being served by the facilities of the district.

A resolution adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall provisionally order the annexation of the real property proposed to be annexed.

The board shall cause notice of the adoption of a resolution pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the property proposed to be annexed is located, and the notice shall state:

That the resolution has been adopted;

The description of the area proposed to be annexed;

The place, time, and date of a board hearing on the proposed annexation at which the board will consider all written objections to the finalization of the annexation; and

That all interested persons may appear at the board hearing and show cause in writing why the annexation should not be made final.

Prior to the board hearing, the board shall obtain written consent to annex the property from the governing body of each county or municipality that includes any of the real property proposed to be annexed.

If, after the board hearing, the board determines by resolution that the proposed annexation is feasible and in the best interest of the district, the board shall furnish by mail to the director of the division of local government within the department of local affairs copies of both the resolution adopted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and the post-hearing resolution and shall request that the director approve the annexation.

If the director approves the annexation in writing, the board, upon the receipt of such approval, shall by resolution enter a final order annexing the real property to the district.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 873, § 1, effective April 30.

32-11.5-606. General annexation provisions.

The failure of any person in the watershed management area or in an area proposed to be annexed to the watershed management area to file a written objection to a proposed annexation in a properly noticed hearing of the board thereon constitutes the assent of the person to the inclusion in the watershed management area of the area described in the notice of the hearing for annexation.

A determination by the board that a proposed annexation is feasible and in the best interests of the district shall be final, conclusive, and not subject to review.

Whenever the board by resolution enters an order annexing real property to the watershed management area, the board shall file the resolution with:

The secretary of state;

The state attorney general;

The division of local government; and

The county clerk and recorder, county assessor, and county treasurer of each county in which the annexed real property is located.

A board resolution annexing real property to the watershed management area is a final order and shall finally and conclusively establish the annexation of the real property to the watershed management area against all persons; except that the attorney general, on behalf of the state, within thirty days of the filing of the resolution with the attorney general as required by paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, may file a proceeding in the nature of quo warranto against the annexation. An annexation shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding except as expressly authorized in this subsection (4).

After the date of the final annexation of real property to the watershed management area by resolution of the board, the annexed real property shall be liable for its proportionate share of existing bonded indebtedness of the district but shall not be liable for any taxes or service charges levied or assessed prior to its annexation to the watershed management area. The annexation of the real property to the watershed management area shall not be made subject to or contingent upon the payment or assumption of any penalty, toll, or charge, other than the taxes and service charges that are uniformly made, assessed, or levied within the watershed management area except as otherwise expressly provided in this article.

The district and the owner of any real property sought to be annexed to the watershed management area may enter into an agreement with respect to the terms and conditions on which the property may be annexed.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire article added, (SB 09-141), ch. 194, p. 874, § 1, effective April 30.